Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-125
Annexed or merged city or village; rights acquired under earlier consolidation; continuance.

Any rights, power, or authority acquired, granted, received, or possessed by any person, city, or village through consolidation effectuated under the terms of Chapter 212 of the Session Laws of Nebraska for 1915, are hereby granted and continued.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 24, p. 414;

C.S.1922, § 3512;

C.S.1929, § 14-125;

R.S.1943, § 14-125;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 32.
July 21, 2022